Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.060

Hearing—Appearance—Defendant's right to representation—Detention of defendant.

(1) The judicial officer must hold a hearing in cases involving offenses prescribed in Article I, section 20, to determine whether any condition or combination of conditions will reasonably assure the safety of any other person and the community upon motion of the attorney for the government.

(2) The hearing must be held immediately upon the defendant's first appearance before the judicial officer unless the defendant, or the attorney for the government, seeks a continuance. Except for good cause, a continuance on motion of such person may not exceed five days (not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday), and a continuance on motion of the attorney for the government may not exceed three days (not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday). During a continuance, such person must be detained.

(3) At the hearing, such defendant has the right to be represented by counsel, and, if financially unable to obtain representation, to have counsel appointed. The defendant must be afforded an opportunity to testify, to present witnesses, to cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing, and to present information by proffer or otherwise. The rules concerning admissibility of evidence in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and consideration of information at the hearing. The facts the judicial officer uses to support a finding that no condition or combination of conditions will reasonably assure the safety of any other person and the community must be supported by clear and convincing evidence of a propensity for violence that creates a substantial likelihood of danger to the community or any persons.

(4) The defendant may be detained pending completion of the hearing. The hearing may be reopened, before or after a determination by the judicial officer, at any time before trial if the judicial officer finds that information exists that was not known to the movant at the time of the hearing and that has a material bearing on the issue whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the safety of any other person and the community.

[ 2010 c 254 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.